Hawaii statutes.
§237D-6.5 Remittances; distribution to
counties. (a) All remittances of taxes imposed under this chapter shall
be made by cash, bank drafts, cashier's check, money order, or certificate of
deposit to the office of the taxation district to which the return was
transmitted.

(b) Revenues collected under this chapter shall
be distributed in the following priority, with the excess revenues to be
deposited into the general fund:

(1) $1,500,000 shall be allocated to the Turtle Bay
conservation easement special fund beginning July 1, 2015, for the
reimbursement to the state general fund of debt service on reimbursable general
obligation bonds, including ongoing expenses related to the issuance of the
bonds, the proceeds of which were used to acquire the conservation easement and
other real property interests in Turtle Bay, Oahu, for the protection,
preservation, and enhancement of natural resources important to the State,
until the bonds are fully amortized;

(2) $26,500,000 shall be allocated to the convention
center enterprise special fund established under section 201B-8;

(3) $82,000,000 shall be allocated to the tourism
special fund established under section 201B-11; provided that:

(A) Beginning on July 1, 2012, and ending on
June 30, 2015, $2,000,000 shall be expended from the tourism special fund for
development and implementation of initiatives to take advantage of expanded
visa programs and increased travel opportunities for international visitors to
Hawaii;

(B) Of the $82,000,000 allocated:

(i) $1,000,000 shall be allocated for the
operation of a Hawaiian center and the museum of Hawaiian music and dance at
the Hawaii convention center; and

(ii) 0.5 per cent of the $82,000,000 shall be
transferred to a sub-account in the tourism special fund to provide funding for
a safety and security budget, in accordance with the Hawaii tourism strategic
plan 2005-2015; and

(C) Of the revenues remaining in the tourism
special fund after revenues have been deposited as provided in this paragraph
and except for any sum authorized by the legislature for expenditure from
revenues subject to this paragraph, beginning July 1, 2007, funds shall be
deposited into the tourism emergency special fund, established in section
201B-10, in a manner sufficient to maintain a fund balance of $5,000,000 in the
tourism emergency special fund;

(4) $103,000,000 for fiscal year 2014-2015,
$103,000,000 for fiscal year 2015-2016, and $93,000,000 for each fiscal year
thereafter shall be allocated as follows: Kauai county shall receive 14.5 per
cent, Hawaii county shall receive 18.6 per cent, city and county of Honolulu
shall receive 44.1 per cent, and Maui county shall receive 22.8 per cent;
provided that commencing with fiscal year 2018-2019, a sum that represents the
difference between a county public employer's annual required contribution for
the separate trust fund established under section 87A-42 and the amount of the
county public employer's contributions into that trust fund shall be retained
by the state director of finance and deposited to the credit of the county
public employer's annual required contribution into that trust fund in each
fiscal year, as provided in section 87A-42, if the respective county fails to
remit the total amount of the county's required annual contributions, as
required under section 87A-43; and

(5) [Paragraph effective until June 30, 2016. For
paragraph effective July 1, 2016, see below.] Of the excess revenues
deposited into the general fund pursuant to this subsection, $3,000,000 shall
be allocated subject to the mutual agreement of the board of land and natural
resources and the board of directors of the Hawaii tourism authority in
accordance with the Hawaii tourism authority strategic plan for:

(A) The protection, preservation, and
enhancement of natural resources important to the visitor industry;

(B) Planning, construction, and repair of
facilities; and

(C) Operation and maintenance costs of public
lands connected with enhancing the visitor experience.

(5) [Paragraph effective July 1, 2016. For
paragraph effective until June 30, 2016, see above.] $3,000,000 shall be
allocated to the special land and development fund established under section
171-19; provided that the allocation shall be expended in accordance with the
Hawaii tourism authority strategic plan for:

(A) The protection, preservation, maintenance,
and enhancement of natural resources, including beaches, important to the
visitor industry;

(B) Planning, construction, and repair of
facilities; and

(C) Operation and maintenance costs of public
lands, including beaches, connected with enhancing the visitor experience.

All transient accommodations taxes shall be
paid into the state treasury each month within ten days after collection and
shall be kept by the state director of finance in special accounts for
distribution as provided in this subsection.

As used in this subsection, "fiscal
year" means the twelve-month period beginning on July 1 of a calendar year
and ending on June 30 of the following calendar year.

(c) On or before January or July 1 of each
year or after the disposition of any tax appeal with respect to an assessment
for periods after June 30, 1990, the state director of finance shall compute
and pay the amount due as provided in subsection (b) to the director of finance
of each county to become a general realization of the county expendable as
such, except as otherwise provided by law. [L 1990, c 185, §2; am L Sp 1993, c
7, §19; am L 1997, c 124, §7; am L 1998, c 156, §19; am L 1999, c 98, §7; am L
2002, c 250, §5 and c 253, §9; am L 2003, c 113, §2; am L 2005, c 235, §8; am L
2006, c 209, §§1, 3; am L 2007, c 201, §3; am L 2009, c 61, §§2, 4; am L 2011,
c 103, §§2, 4; am L 2012, c 171, §2 and c 243, §2; am L 2013, c 161, §§2 to 4
and c 268, §§10, 16; am L 2014, c 81, §4 and c 174, §1; am L 2015, c 117, §3, c
121, §7, and c 237, §12]

Note

Conditional repeal of L 2015, c 121 on January 1, 2016. L
2015, c 121, §17(1).

State-county functions working group; 2015-2016 reports to
legislature, governor, mayors, and councils (ceases to exist upon adjournment
sine die of 2016 regular session). L 2014, c 174, §2.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next